Mississippi, session 2026, HB1660.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Reports, surveys, schedules, lists or data compiled or collected for the purpose of identifying, evaluating or planning the safety enhancement of potential accident sites, hazardous roadway conditions or railway highway crossings, pursuant to federal law or for the purpose of developing any highway safety construction improvement project that may be implemented using federal aid highway funds, are exempt from disclosure under the Mississippi Public Records Act of 1983. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 1, Title 65, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.